Missouri, session 2026, SB1415.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.353, 115.355, 115.365, 115.507,
115.511, 115.515, 115.517, 115.531, 115.555, 115.575, 115.603,
476.680, 478.010, 478.320, and 478.330, RSMo, are repealed and
fourteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 115.353, 115.355, 115.365, 115.507, 115.511, 115.515,
115.517, 115.531, 115.555, 115.575, 115.603, 478.010, 478.320,
and 478.330, to read as follows:
115.353. All declarations of candidacy shall be filed
as follows:
(1) For presidential elector, United States senator,
representative in Congress, statewide office, circuit judge
[not subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of
the Missouri Constitution], state senator, and state
representative, in the office of the secretary of state;
(2) For all county offices which for the purpose of
election procedures shall include associate circuit judges
[not subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1415 2
the Missouri Constitution], in the office of the county
election authority;
(3) For all county offices, in the office of the
county election authority. In any county in which there are
two boards of election commissioners, the county clerk shall
be deemed to be the election authority for purposes of this
section.
115.355. 1. Except as provided in subsections 2 and 5
of this section and in section 115.377, each declaration of
candidacy for nomination in a primary election shall be
filed by the candidate in person in the office of the
appropriate election official.
2. A candidate may file his declaration of candidacy
by certified mail if he is:
(1) Unable to appear in person because of physical
disability, and the declaration is accompanied by a sworn
statement of a licensed physician so stating; or
(2) A member of the Armed Forces of the United States
on active duty, and the declaration is accompanied by a
sworn statement of the candidate's commanding officer so
stating.
3. Except as provided in section 115.377, no election
official shall accept for filing any declaration of
candidacy for nomination in a primary election not presented
to him by the candidate in person or which, if sent by
certified mail pursuant to subsection 2 of this section, is
not accompanied by the statement required in the same
subsection.
4. Election officials shall require proof of identity
of persons when filing declarations of candidacy in person
and when filing by mail as provided in subsection 2 or 5 of
this section.

SB 1415 3
[5. Any judge seeking retention under Sections 25(a)
to 25(g) of Article V of the Missouri Constitution may file
his declaration of candidacy for election to succeed himself
by certified mail.]
115.365. 1. The nominating committee authorized to
select a candidate for nomination or election to office
pursuant to section 115.363 shall be one of the following:
(1) To select a candidate for county office, the
nominating committee shall be the county committee of the
party;
(2) To select a candidate for state representative,
the nominating committee shall be the legislative district
committee of the party;
(3) To select a candidate for state senator, the
nominating committee shall be the senatorial district
committee of the party;
(4) To select a candidate for circuit court judge [not
subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the
State Constitution], the nominating committee shall be the
judicial district committee of the party;
(5) To select a candidate for representative in
Congress, the nominating committee shall be the
congressional district committee of the party;
(6) To select a candidate for statewide office, the
nominating committee shall be the state committee of the
party.
2. After any decennial redistricting, the nominating
committee shall be composed from the new districts, and the
new district lines shall be used in the selection of a
candidate; provided, however, that members of nominating
committees for candidates for special elections to fill

SB 1415 4
vacancies conducted pursuant to section 21.130 shall be from
the old districts.
115.507. 1. Not later than the second Tuesday after
the election, the verification board shall issue a statement
announcing the results of each election held within its
jurisdiction and shall certify the returns to each political
subdivision and special district submitting a candidate or
question at the election. The statement shall include a
categorization of the number of regular and absentee votes
cast in the election, and how those votes were cast;
provided however, that absentee votes shall not be reported
separately where such reporting would disclose how any
single voter cast his or her vote. When absentee votes are
not reported separately the statement shall include the
reason why such reporting did not occur. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require the election authority
to tabulate absentee ballots by precinct on election night.
2. The verification board shall prepare the returns by
drawing an abstract of the votes cast for each candidate and
on each question submitted to a vote of people in its
jurisdiction by the state and by each political subdivision
and special district at the election. The abstract of votes
drawn by the verification board shall be the official
returns of the election.
3. Any home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county may
by ordinance designate one of the election authorities
situated partially or wholly within that home rule city to
be the verification board that shall certify the returns of
such city submitting a candidate or question at any election
and shall notify each verification board within the city of
that designation by providing each with a copy of such duly

SB 1415 5
adopted ordinance. Not later than the second Tuesday after
any election in any city making such a designation, each
verification board within the city shall certify the returns
of such city submitting a candidate or question at the
election to the election authority so designated by the city
to be its verification board, and such election authority
shall announce the results of the election and certify the
cumulative returns to the city in conformance with
subsections 1 and 2 of this section not later than ten days
thereafter.
4. Not later than the second Tuesday after each
election at which the name of a candidate for nomination or
election to the office of president of the United States,
United States senator, representative in Congress, governor,
lieutenant governor, state senator, state representative,
judge of the circuit court, secretary of state, attorney
general, state treasurer, or state auditor, or at which an
initiative, referendum, or constitutional amendment [or
question of retaining a judge subject to the provisions of
Article V, Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of the State
Constitution,] appears on the ballot in a jurisdiction, the
election authority of the jurisdiction shall mail or deliver
to the secretary of state the abstract of the votes given in
its jurisdiction, by polling place or precinct, for each
such office and on each such question. If mailed, the
abstract shall be enclosed in a strong, sealed envelope or
envelopes. On the outside of each envelope shall be
printed: "Returns of election held in the county of ______
(City of St. Louis, Kansas City) on the ______ day of
______, ______,", etc.
115.511. 1. The secretary of state shall convene the
board of state canvassers to total the abstracts of each

SB 1415 6
primary election and the board shall, not later than two
weeks after receiving all required abstracts from the
primary election, issue a statement announcing the results
of the primary election for federal officers, governor,
lieutenant governor, state senators and representatives,
circuit judges, secretary of state, attorney general, state
treasurer, and state auditor.
2. The secretary of state shall convene the board of
state canvassers to total the abstracts of each general
election and the board shall, not later than the second
Tuesday in December following the general election, issue a
statement announcing the results of the general election for
federal officers, governor, lieutenant governor, state
senators and representatives, circuit judges, [appellate and
circuit judges subject to the provisions of Article V,
Section 25 of the State Constitution], secretary of state,
attorney general, state treasurer, and state auditor.
3. The secretary of state shall convene the board of
state canvassers to total the abstracts of each special
election at which the name of a candidate for nomination or
election to the office of United States senator,
representative in Congress, governor, lieutenant governor,
state senator, state representative, circuit judge [not
subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the
State Constitution], secretary of state, attorney general,
state treasurer, or state auditor, or at which an
initiative, referendum, or constitutional amendment appears
on the ballot, and the board shall, not later than two weeks
after receiving all required abstracts from the election,
issue a statement announcing the results of the election for
such office or on such question.

SB 1415 7
115.515. 1. If two or more persons receive an equal
number of votes for nomination as a party's candidate for
any federal office, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary
of state, attorney general, state treasurer, state auditor,
circuit judge [not subject to the provisions of Article V,
Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of the State Constitution], state
senator, or state representative, and a higher number of
votes than any other candidate for the same office on the
same party ballot, the governor shall, immediately after the
results of the election have been announced, issue a
proclamation stating the fact and ordering a special primary
election to determine the party's nominee for the office.
The proclamation shall set the date of the election, which
shall be not less than fourteen or more than thirty days
after the proclamation is issued, and shall be sent by the
governor to each election authority responsible for
conducting the special primary election. In the
proclamation, the governor shall specify the name of each
candidate for the office to be voted on at the election, and
the special primary election shall be conducted and the
votes counted as in other primary elections.
2. If two or more persons receive an equal number of
votes for nomination as a party's candidate for any other
office, except party committeeman or committeewoman, and a
higher number of votes than any other candidate for the same
office on the same party ballot, the officer with whom such
candidates filed their declarations of candidacy shall,
immediately after the results of the election have been
certified, issue a proclamation stating the fact and
ordering a special primary election to determine the party's
nominee for the office. The proclamation shall set the date
of the election, which shall be not less than fourteen or

SB 1415 8
more than thirty days after the proclamation is issued, and
shall be sent by the officer to each election authority
responsible for conducting the special primary election. In
the proclamation, the officer shall specify the name of each
candidate for the office to be voted on at the election, and
the special primary election shall be conducted and the
votes counted as in other primary elections.
3. As an alternative to the procedure prescribed in
subsections 1 and 2 of this section, if the candidates who
received an equal number of votes in such election agree to
the procedure prescribed in this subsection, the officer
with whom such candidates filed their declarations of
candidacy may, after notification of the time and place of
such drawing given to each such candidate at least five days
before such drawing, determine the winner of such election
by lot. Any candidate who received an equal number of votes
may decline to have his or her name put into such drawing.
115.517. 1. If two or more persons receive an equal
number of votes for election to the office of governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state auditor,
state treasurer or attorney general, and a higher number of
votes than any other candidate for the same office, the
secretary of state shall, immediately after the results of
the election have been announced, issue a proclamation
stating the fact, and the general assembly shall, by joint
vote and without delay at its next regular session, choose
one of such persons for the office. The speaker of the
house shall file a certificate declaring which person has
been elected to the office with the secretary of state.
2. If two or more persons receive an equal number of
votes for election to federal office, state senator, state
representative or circuit judge [not subject to the

SB 1415 9
provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the State
Constitution], and a higher number of votes than any other
candidate for the same office, the governor shall,
immediately after the results of the election have been
announced, issue a proclamation stating the fact and
ordering a special election to determine which candidate is
elected to the office. The proclamation shall set the date
of the election and shall be sent by the governor to each
election authority responsible for conducting the special
election. In his proclamation, the governor shall specify
the name of each candidate for the office to be voted on at
the election, and the special election shall be conducted
and the votes counted as in other elections.
3. If two or more persons receive an equal number of
votes for nomination or election to any office not otherwise
provided for in section 115.515 or this section, and a
higher number of votes than any other candidate for
nomination or election to the same office, the officer with
whom such candidates filed their declarations of candidacy
shall, immediately after the results of the election have
been certified, issue a proclamation stating the fact and
ordering a special election to determine which candidate is
elected to the office. The proclamation shall set the date
of the election and shall be sent by the officer to each
election authority responsible for conducting the special
election. In his proclamation, the officer shall specify
the name of each candidate for the office to be voted on at
the election, and the special election shall be conducted
and the votes counted as in other elections.
4. As an alternative to the procedure prescribed in
subsections 1, 2, and 3 of this section, if the candidates
who received an equal number of votes in such election agree

SB 1415 10
to the procedure prescribed in this subsection, the officer
with whom such candidates filed their declarations of
candidacy may, after notification of the time and place of
such drawing given to each such candidate at least five days
before such drawing, determine the winner of such election
by lot. Any candidate who received an equal number of votes
may decline to have his name put into such drawing.
115.531. 1. Not later than five days after the
official announcement of the results of a primary election
is issued by the election authority or the secretary of
state, as the case may be, any candidate desiring to contest
the primary election shall file a verified petition in the
office of the clerk of the circuit court of any circuit in
which part of the election was held and in which any alleged
irregularity occurred, unless the office involved in the
contest is that of a circuit or associate circuit judge [not
subject to Section 25, Article V, Constitution of Missouri],
in which case the verified petition shall be filed, heard,
and determined by an adjoining circuit court selected by the
contestant as specified in section 115.575. The contestant
shall only be required to file one petition with the circuit
court for each election contest regardless of the number of
counties within the court's jurisdiction. The petition
shall set forth the points on which the contestant wishes to
contest the election and the facts the contestant will prove
in support of such points, and shall pray leave to produce
such proof. The judge of the court shall immediately note
on the petition the date it was filed and shall immediately
set a date, not later than five days after the petition is
filed, for a preliminary hearing. If the petition is filed
in vacation, the judge of the circuit court shall
immediately convene the court in special session for the

SB 1415 11
purpose of hearing the contest. If no regular judge of the
court is available the supreme court shall immediately
assign another judge. The circuit court in which the
petition is filed shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all
matters relating to the contest and may issue appropriate
orders to all election authorities in the area in which the
contested election was held.
2. If a petition contesting a primary election is
filed in an incorrect circuit, the court in which it is
filed shall have jurisdiction and shall promptly transfer
the suit to the correct circuit court.
115.555. All contested elections for the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, state treasurer, and state auditor shall be heard
and determined by the supreme court. Likewise, all contests
to the results of elections on constitutional amendments[,]
and on state statutes submitted or referred to the voters[,
and on questions relating to the retention of appellate and
circuit judges subject to Article V, Section 25 of the
State Constitution] shall be heard and determined by the
supreme court.
115.575. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of this
chapter to the contrary, all contested elections for the
office of circuit or associate circuit judge [not subject to
the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the State
Constitution], whether contested on the basis of
qualification, irregularity, or other cause, or for recount
other than the automatic recount provided for in section
115.601, and whether in a primary or general election, shall
be filed in and heard and determined by an adjoining circuit
court selected by the contestant.

SB 1415 12
2. All contested elections on any office or question
other than those provided for in sections 115.555, 115.563,
and subsection 1 of this section shall be heard and
determined by the circuit court of any circuit, selected by
the contestant, in which all or any part of the election was
held and in which any alleged irregularity occurred. The
contestant shall only be required to file one petition with
the circuit court for each election contest regardless of
the number of counties within the court's jurisdiction.
3. If a petition contesting any election is filed in
an incorrect circuit, the court in which it is filed shall
have jurisdiction and shall promptly transfer the suit to
the correct circuit court.
115.603. Each established political party shall have a
state committee, a congressional district committee for each
congressional district in the state, a judicial district
committee for each circuit judge district in the state [not
subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the
state Constitution], a senatorial district committee for
each senatorial district in the state, a legislative
district committee for each legislative district in the
state, and a county committee for each county in the state,
except any city not within a county which shall have a city
committee in lieu of a county committee.
478.010. 1. [Except as provided in Section 25 of
Article V of the Constitution of Missouri,] The circuit
judges of the various judicial circuits shall be elected at
the general elections as herein provided and at the general
election every six years thereafter, and shall enter upon
the duties of their office on the first day in January next
following their election; provided, however, that any terms

SB 1415 13
commencing in 1981 and 1983 shall commence on the first
Monday in January.
2. The circuit judge of judicial circuit number one
shall be elected in 1980.
3. The circuit judge of judicial circuit number thirty-
six shall be elected in 1984.
4. The circuit judges of the remaining judicial
circuits, except those covered by sections 478.370 through
478.715, shall be elected in 1982.
478.320. 1. In counties having a population of thirty
thousand or less, there shall be one associate circuit
judge. In counties having a population of more than thirty
thousand and less than one hundred thousand, there shall be
two associate circuit judges. In counties having a
population of one hundred thousand or more, there shall be
three associate circuit judges and one additional associate
circuit judge for each additional one hundred thousand
inhabitants.
2. For purposes of this section, notwithstanding the
provisions of section 1.100, population of a county shall be
determined on the basis of the last previous decennial
census of the United States; and, beginning after
certification of the year 2000 decennial census, on the
basis of annual population estimates prepared by the United
States Bureau of the Census, provided that the number of
associate circuit judge positions in a county shall be
adjusted only after population estimates for three
consecutive years indicate population change in the county
to a level provided by subsection 1 of this section.
3. [Except in circuits where associate circuit judges
are selected under the provisions of Sections 25(a) to (g)
of Article V of the constitution,] The election of associate

SB 1415 14
circuit judges shall in all respects be conducted as other
elections and the returns made as for other officers.
4. [In counties not subject to Sections 25(a) to (g)
of Article V of the constitution,] Associate circuit judges
shall be elected by the county at large.
5. No associate circuit judge shall practice law, or
do a law business, nor shall he or she accept, during his or
her term of office, any public appointment for which he or
she receives compensation for his or her services.
6. No person shall be elected as an associate circuit
judge unless he or she has resided in the county for which
he or she is to be elected at least one year prior to the
date of his or her election; provided that, a person who is
appointed by the governor to fill a vacancy may file for
election and be elected notwithstanding the provisions of
this subsection.
478.330. 1. When an annual judicial performance
report submitted pursuant to section 477.405 indicates for
three consecutive calendar years the need for two or more
full-time judicial positions in any judicial circuit there
shall be one additional circuit judge position authorized in
such circuit, subject to an initial appropriation made for
that purpose. The clerk of the supreme court shall notify
the Missouri revisor of statutes of any new circuit
judgeships authorized under this section, and the Missouri
revisor of statutes shall publish a footnote to this section
listing the authorized judgeships and corresponding judicial
circuits.
2. [Except in circuits where circuit judges are
selected under the provisions of Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of
Article V of the Missouri Constitution or] Except as
otherwise provided by law, a circuit judge authorized under

SB 1415 15
subsection 1 of this section shall be elected at the next
general election after the authorization, and every six
years thereafter. Such judicial position shall not be
considered vacant or filled by appointment until January
first next following the authorization. [Except in circuits
where circuit judges are selected under the provisions of
Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of Article V of the Missouri
Constitution,] The election of circuit judges authorized by
this section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter
115.
[476.680. 1. The votes on the question
shall be counted, canvassed and returned by the
regular boards of judges, clerks and officers as
votes for candidates are counted, canvassed and
returned, and the abstract made by the officials
in general charge of elections in each such
county shall be returned to the secretary of
state on separate abstract sheets, in the manner
provided for abstract of votes for state and
county officers.
2. The secretary of state, in the presence
of the governor, sixty days after the election,
shall proceed to canvass the votes on the
question; and the governor shall forthwith issue
his proclamation, giving the whole number of
votes cast in each such judicial circuit for and
against the question, and if the question is
approved by a majority of those voting thereon,
declaring the nonpartisan selection of the
circuit and associate circuit judges to be in
full force and effect in each such judicial
circuit as provided for in Article V, Section 29
of the Constitution of 1945.]
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective only upon approval by the voters of an amendment
to article V of the Constitution of Missouri that repeals
the appointment of judges of the supreme court and of the
court of appeals by the governor from nominees selected by a

SB 1415 16
nonpartisan commission and establishes the appointment of
all judges of the supreme court and of the court of appeals
by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate,
and for the election of all circuit and associate judges.
✓